Utah statutes.
53C-2-102.   Information to be furnished by provider -- Director to adopt confidential information rules.

(1)  As used in this section, "provider" means a prospective applicant, applicant, partner, or lessee.

(2) (a)  The administration may require a provider to furnish any information necessary to carry out the duties of this title, including financial information, geological and mine maps, well logs, and assays.

(b)  Any information submitted to the administration which the provider and the director agree in writing is of a proprietary nature shall be kept confidential and may not be released without written permission from the provider.

(3)  The director shall adopt rules under which the administration may retain, without disclosure to third parties, information including that received under Subsection (2) which the provider and the director agree is of a protected or proprietary nature, unless the information is required by federal or state law to be of a nonproprietary nature.

